District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.12

Payment of benefits.

The payment of benefits under the retirement programs under § 1-626.05(2) and (3) shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of §§ 401(a) and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. §§ 401(a) and 457 ].

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2612
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079
1981 Ed., § 1-627.12.
Sections 401(a) and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in this section are classified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 401(a) and 457, respectively.